Montana, session 2025, SB522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Eliminate or reduce waiting lists for covered services. (1) The
department shall implement administrative, programmatic, and funding initiatives to reduce or eliminate waiting
lists for services covered under the Montana medicaid program.
(2) Initiatives may include:
(a) applying for medicaid waivers, amendments to existing medicaid waivers, or state plan
amendments;
(b) recalculating reimbursement rates;
(c) providing add-on rates for services with waiting lists; and
(d) any additional initiatives that comply with federal policy.
(3) The department shall prioritize the reduction or elimination of waiting lists for the following types
of services:
(a) senior and long-term care;
(b) behavioral health;
(c) dental services;
(d) family education and support services; and
(e) home-based and community-based services provided through the developmental disabilities
program's 0208 medicaid waiver.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 522

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 522.1
(4) The department shall provide an annual report to the legislature, in accordance with 5-11-210,
detailing:
(a) each waiting list for a covered service, including the number of people on the waiting list each
month;
(b) efforts underway by the department to reduce or eliminate the waiting list; and
(c) the date the department expects the waiting list to be eliminated.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "waiting list" means a list of persons enrolled or presumptively
enrolled in the Montana medicaid program who are eligible for a service but cannot receive that service in 90 or
fewer days due to a lack of funding, available providers, enrollment slots, or other service supply issues.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 53, chapter 6, and the provisions of Title 53, chapter 6, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 522